Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0310.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6b. (1) The tri-share child care program is established in the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for the continuation of the child care facilitator program originally initiated and funded as a pilot project under section 1047(31) of article 5 of 2020 PA 166, and as continued and modified in successive appropriations. (2) The tri-share child care fund is created within the state treasury. (3) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. (5) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (6) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall expend money from the fund, upon appropriation, to do all of the following: (a) Administer the tri-share care program established under subsection (1). (b) Support tri-share regional recruitment and statewide services. (c) Create and enforce benchmarks for regional recruitment and statewide services for any program partner receiving appropriated funds. (7) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award funds to ensure regional employer recruitment efforts and statewide program administration. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may provide quarterly advances for timely provider payments. On conclusion of the program or termination of any grant agreement, any unspent award funds held by any program partner must be spent down toward this state's share of child care payments or returned to this state at the discretion of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (8) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall innovate program and administration options to attract employer program participation in this state. (9) A child care facilitator receiving funds under this section must be a nonprofit, a limited liability company, a C-corporation, an S-corporation, an intermediate school district, or a sole proprietor.